Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1361
Agency; plan;
submit; update.

Each agency shall submit a plan
for that agency to the office for review and shall work with
the administrator to insure effectiveness of the plan. Each agency shall annually
update its plan based on guidelines developed by the administrator.

Laws 1979, LB 500, § 7;

Laws 1987, LB 491, § 21;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 18.